Wyoming statutes. Title 41 Water
Article 4. Contesting Organization or Assessments; Limitation of Actions

§ 41-6-401.
Organization.

When any irrigation or drainage district has been organized and the legality of its organization has not been questioned by proceedings in quo warranto, or otherwise, within one (1) year from the effective date of this act as to districts heretofore organized, or within two (2) years from the date of entry of the order of court establishing such district and appointing commissioners therefor as to districts hereafter organized, it shall be conclusively deemed to be a legally established district, and its lawful organization shall not be questioned in any subsequent suit or proceeding.

History.

Laws 1929, ch. 65, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 122-1101; C.S. 1945, § 71-2101; W.S. 1957, § 41-260.

Cross references. —

For duty of clerk of district court to transmit copies of judgments involving water rights to board of control, see §

41-4-207

.

§ 41-6-402.
Assessments.

Where any irrigation or drainage district shall make and levy any assessment against any property within such district, the same shall not be questioned in any suit or proceeding unless such suit or proceeding is instituted on or before the second December thirty-first following such levy or assessment.

History.

Laws 1929, ch. 65, § 2; R.S. 1931, § 122-1102; C.S. 1945, § 71-2102; W.S. 1957, § 41-261; 2020 ch. 87, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, substituted “thirty-first” for “31st.”